District of Columbia statutes.
10-1203.06

Expiration provisions.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

Sections 301, 302, 303, and 304 shall apply as of October 1, 1997.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 306, 41 DCR 5333
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 2(l)(1), 45 DCR 4826

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-832.

References in Text

“Sections 301, 302, 303, and 304,” referenced in (b), refer to §§ 301, 302, 303 and 304 of D.C. Law 10-188, effective September 28, 1994.